Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-154
Militia; enlistments; length.

Enlistments in the militia called out by proclamation of the Governor shall be for the term specified in such proclamation.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 21, p. 373;

R.S.1913, § 3920;

C.S.1922, § 3328;

C.S.1929, § 55-155;

R.S.1943, § 55-132;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 52, p. 1598.